Wisconsin, session 2025, SB705.
do enact as follows:SB705,11Section 1. 100.56 of the statutes is created to read:SB705,2,22100.56 Nonrecourse civil litigation advances. (1) In this section:SB705,2,43(a) “Company” means a person that enters into a nonrecourse civil litigation 4advance transaction with a consumer.SB705,2,65(b) “Consumer” means an individual who is or may become a plaintiff or 6claimant or demandant in any dispute.SB705,2,77(c) “Dispute” means any of the following:SB705,2,881. Any civil claim or action.SB705,2,992. Any alternative dispute resolution proceeding.SB705,2,11103. Any administrative proceeding before any agency or instrumentality of the 11state.SB705,2,1512(d) “Finance charge” means the sum of all charges, including interest, fees, 13and assigned proceeds from a dispute, payable directly or indirectly by the 14consumer to the company as an incident to or as a condition of the company’s cash 15payment described in par. (e).SB705,2,2016(e) “Nonrecourse civil litigation advance” means a transaction in which a 17company makes a cash payment to or on behalf of a consumer who has a pending 18dispute in exchange for the right to receive an amount out of the proceeds of any 19realized settlement, judgment, award, or verdict the consumer may receive in the 20dispute.SB705,2,2321(2) (a) A company may not enter into a nonrecourse civil litigation advance 22transaction unless there is a written contract between the company and the 23consumer governing the transaction.SB705,3,51(b) A company may not contract for, or otherwise require, repayment of a 2nonrecourse civil litigation advance in an amount that would result in the finance 3charge imposed by the company exceeding the weekly prime interest rate for the 4week prior to the date on which the contract was entered into, as reported by the 5federal reserve board in federal reserve statistical release H.15, plus 10 percent.SB705,3,76(c) A company may not provide to a consumer with whom it has entered into a 7contract under par. (a) a total amount of money exceeding $100,000.SB705,3,118(d) A nonrecourse civil litigation advance may be prepaid by the consumer at 9any time in whole or in part. Upon a prepayment of the nonrecourse civil litigation 10advance, the consumer is entitled to a pro rata reduction in any finance charge 11imposed as part of the nonrecourse civil litigation advance transaction.SB705,3,1412(3) A contract under sub. (2) (a) may not provide for repayment of the 13nonrecourse civil litigation advance later than 36 months after the contract is 14entered into.SB705,3,1515(4) (a) A contract under sub. (2) (a) shall include all of the following:SB705,3,19161. The annual percentage rate of the finance charge imposed under the 17contract, determined consistently with the provisions of section 107 of the federal 18Truth in Lending Act, 15 USC 1606, and federal Regulation Z adopted under that 19act, 12 CFR 1026.SB705,3,23202. A statement that the nonrecourse civil litigation advance may be prepaid in 21full or in part and that, if the nonrecourse civil litigation advance is prepaid, the 22consumer may receive a pro rata reduction in any finance charge imposed as part of 23the nonrecourse civil litigation advance transaction.SB705,4,513. On the front page of the contract, a disclosure of the total amount of money 2to be provided to the consumer and the total amount of money to be assigned by the 3consumer to the company, described in 6-month intervals for a total period not 4exceeding 36 months, along with an itemization of all one-time fees to be charged to 5the consumer.SB705,4,964. A provision that the consumer may cancel the contract, without penalty or 7further obligation, within 5 business days after entering into the contract if, during 8this period, the consumer returns to the company the cash payment described in 9sub. (1) (e) with a notice of cancellation.SB705,4,13105. A provision that the company has no right to, and will not, make any 11decisions with respect to the conduct of the dispute or any settlement or resolution 12of the dispute and that those decisions remain solely with the consumer and the 13consumer’s attorney.SB705,4,15146. A provision that the company has no right to participate in the prosecution 15of the dispute or to obtain documents or evidence connected with the dispute.SB705,4,19167. A provision that the company accepts only an assignment of an amount of 17the potential proceeds from the dispute and does not accept an assignment of the 18consumer’s legal claim. This provision shall also specify that the company has no 19right to pursue the consumer’s legal claim on behalf of or in lieu of the consumer.SB705,5,5208. A provision that, except for any amount prepaid by the consumer, the 21company may be paid only from the consumer’s proceeds of the dispute and the 22consumer’s proceeds of the dispute are determined after deducting the consumer’s 23reasonable attorney fees and costs. This provision shall also specify that the 1consumer does not owe the company anything if there is no recovery by the 2consumer in the dispute unless the consumer violates the terms of the contract. 3This provision shall also specify that, if there are insufficient proceeds to pay the 4company in full, the company may be paid only to the extent that there are available 5proceeds from the dispute, unless the consumer violates the terms of the contract.SB705,5,869. A provision that, if the consumer is represented by an attorney, any 7proceeds from the dispute paid to the company may be paid only from the trust 8account of the consumer’s attorney.SB705,5,119(b) Each provision or disclosure required under this subsection shall be in 10boldface type and of a type size no smaller than 12-point, except that the provision 11under par. (a) 8. shall be of a type size no smaller than 15-point.SB705,5,1412(5) (a) In this subsection, “health care provider” has the meaning given in s. 13146.81 (1), but also includes any individual licensed or certified in another state for 14the same or equivalent profession.SB705,5,1715(b) A company may not pay or offer to pay commissions or referral fees to any 16attorney or employee of a law firm, or to any health care provider or employee of a 17health care provider, for referring a consumer to the company.SB705,5,1918(6) (a) Except as provided in par. (c), any company that violates this section is 19subject to a forfeiture of not less than $25 nor more than $5,000 for each violation.SB705,5,2220(b) In addition to the forfeiture under par. (a), any company that willfully 21violates this section may not recover from the consumer money advanced to the 22consumer or any finance charge on that money.SB705,6,323(c) It is a defense to a violation of this section if the company establishes that 1the violation was the result of an unintentional good faith error and, at the time of 2the violation, the company had in place policies or procedures designed to achieve 3compliance with this section.SB705,24Section 2. 138.04 of the statutes is amended to read:SB705,6,115138.04 Legal rate. The rate of interest upon the loan or forbearance of any 6money, goods, or things in action shall be $5 upon the $100 for one year and 7according to that rate for a greater or less sum or for a longer or a shorter time; but 8parties may contract for the payment and receipt of a rate of interest not exceeding 9the rate allowed in ss. 100.56 (2) (b), 138.041 to 138.056, 138.09 to 138.14, 218.0101 10to 218.0163, or 422.201, in which case such rate shall be clearly expressed in 11writing.SB705,312Section 3. 757.43 of the statutes is created to read:SB705,6,1413757.43 Litigation financing by foreign persons prohibited. (1) In this 14section:SB705,6,1515(a) “Agent of a foreign principal” has the meaning given in 22 USC 611 (c).SB705,6,1616(b) “Foreign state” has the meaning given in 28 USC 1603 (a). Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb705 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb705 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB705 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB705 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB705: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting